Colorado, session 2026A, HB1318.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Liam
Stewart School Zone Act".
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-615, amend (2);
and add (4) and (5) as follows:
42-4-615. School zones - increase in penalties for moving traffic
violations.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(2) (a) For the purposes of AS USED IN this section, "school zone"
means an area that is designated as a school zone and has ALL ROADWAYS
WITHIN AT LEAST ONE THOUSAND FEET OF A SCHOOL PROPERTY BOUNDARY;
EXCEPT THAT:
(I) STATE HIGHWAYS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-4-110.5, ARE NOT
INCLUDED IN A SCHOOL ZONE UNLESS DESIGNATED AS PART OF A SCHOOL
ZONE BY THE COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION OR BY A
COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY WITH THE WRITTEN
APPROVAL OF THE COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION;
(II) A SCHOOL ZONE THAT EXISTS ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SUBSECTION (2) THAT EXTENDS MORE THAN TWO HUNDRED FEET FROM A
SCHOOL PROPERTY BOUNDARY IS THE SCHOOL ZONE FOR THAT SCHOOL
PROPERTY; AND
(III) IF A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY THAT HAS
JURISDICTION OVER A SCHOOL ZONE REDUCES THE SIZE OF THE SCHOOL ZONE
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION, THEN ONLY THE REDUCED
SCHOOL ZONE IS THE SCHOOL ZONE FOR THAT SCHOOL PROPERTY.
(b) IF A SCHOOL ZONE EXISTING PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II)
OF THIS SECTION IS LESS THAN TWO HUNDRED FEET FROM A SCHOOL
PROPERTY, THE COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY THAT HAS
JURISDICTION OVER THE SCHOOL ZONE MUST INCREASE THE SCHOOL ZONE TO
A MINIMUM OF TWO HUNDRED FEET.
(c) A SCHOOL ZONE MUST HAVE appropriate signs posted indicating
A SCHOOL ZONE AND INDICATING that the penalties and surcharges WITHIN
A SCHOOL ZONE will be doubled. The state or local government having
jurisdiction over the placement of traffic signs and traffic control devices
in the A school zone area shall designate when the area will be deemed to
be a school zone for the purposes of this section, In making such
designation, the state or local government shall consider when increased
penalties are necessary to protect the safety of school children WHICH,
EXCEPT IF REDUCED AS PERMITTED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION,
MUST INCLUDE ALL ROADWAYS WITHIN ONE THOUSAND FEET OF THE SCHOOL
PROPERTY BOUNDARY AND SHALL POST THE SIGNS REQUIRED BY THIS
SECTION. FOR SCHOOL ZONES EXISTING PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II)
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1318

OF THIS SECTION, SIGNAGE THAT EXISTS ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SUBSECTION (2) MEETS THE SIGNAGE REQUIREMENTS FOR THIS SUBSECTION.
(d) A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL COMPILE
A LIST OF SCHOOLS FOR WHICH IT MUST DETERMINE SCHOOL ZONES FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION. A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR
MUNICIPALITY HAS THE AUTHORITY TO DETERMINE WHICH SCHOOLS TO
INCLUDE ON THE LIST.
(4) A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY THAT HAS
JURISDICTION OVER A SCHOOL ZONE MAY REDUCE THE SIZE OF THE SCHOOL
ZONE TO EXTEND TO LESS THAN ONE THOUSAND FEET FROM A SCHOOL
PROPERTY BOUNDARY BUT SHALL NOT REDUCE THE SIZE OF THE SCHOOL
ZONE TO LESS THAN TWO HUNDRED FEET FROM A SCHOOL PROPERTY
BOUNDARY. A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL NOT
REDUCE THE SIZE OF A SCHOOL ZONE WITHOUT FIRST HOLDING A PUBLIC
HEARING.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A COUNTY, CITY AND
COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY FROM INCREASING THE SIZE OF A SCHOOL ZONE
TO LARGER THAN ONE THOUSAND FEET FROM A SCHOOL PROPERTY
BOUNDARY OR, IN COLLABORATION WITH A LOCAL SCHOOL BOARD, FROM
RAISING REVENUE THROUGH BONDING TO FINANCE INCREASED SCHOOL ZONE
SIGNAGE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-110.5, amend
(1.1)(a)(II) and (2)(g)(III); and add (1.1)(a.5) as follows:
42-4-110.5. Automated vehicle identification systems - school
buses - safe route to school - exceptions to liability - penalty -
contracting - limits on use of photographs and video - rules - legislative
declaration - definitions.
(1.1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) (II) "Automated vehicle identification system" includes a system
used to detect a violation of part 11 of this article 4 or a local speed
ordinance; a system used to detect violations of traffic restrictions imposed
by traffic signals or traffic signs; a system used to detect the overtaking of
a stopped school bus with actuated visual signal lights in violation of
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1318

section 42-4-1903 (1)(a); A SYSTEM USED TO DETECT A MOVING TRAFFIC
VIOLATION IN A SCHOOL ZONE OR ALONG A SAFE ROUTE TO SCHOOL; and a
system used to detect violations of bus lane or bicycle lane restrictions.
(a.5) "SAFE ROUTE TO SCHOOL" MEANS A ROADWAY THAT IS
FREQUENTED BY PEDESTRIANS AND BICYCLISTS ON THEIR WAY TO OR FROM
A NEARBY SCHOOL THAT A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR A
MUNICIPALITY DESIGNATES TO INCREASE PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLIST
SAFETY.
(2) A county, city and county, or municipality may adopt an
ordinance authorizing the use of an automated vehicle identification system
to detect violations of traffic regulations adopted by the county, city and
county, or municipality, or the state, a county, a city and county, or a
municipality may utilize an automated vehicle identification system to
detect traffic violations under state law, subject to the following conditions
and limitations and, as applicable, the requirements for state highways set
forth in and any rules adopted by the department of transportation pursuant
to subsection (2.5) of this section:
(g) (III) This subsection (2)(g) does not apply to an automated
vehicle identification system designed to detect disobedience to a traffic
control signal, or the overtaking of a school bus with actuated visual signal
lights, OR A MOVING VIOLATION ALONG A SAFE ROUTE TO SCHOOL.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 42-4-119 as
follows:
42-4-119. Establishment of a school street - speed limit -
definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, "SCHOOL STREET" MEANS A PORTION
OF A ROADWAY IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT TO A SCHOOL PROPERTY
BOUNDARY THAT IS DESIGNATED AS A SCHOOL STREET.
(2) A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY
DESIGNATE A ROADWAY AS A SCHOOL STREET; EXCEPT THAT A STATE
HIGHWAY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-4-110.5, MUST NOT BE DESIGNATED AS
A SCHOOL STREET, UNLESS DESIGNATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
42-4-615 (2).
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1318

(3) A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL NOT
DESIGNATE A ROADWAY THAT DIRECTLY CONNECTS TO A STATE HIGHWAY
AS A SCHOOL STREET WITHOUT THE WRITTEN APPROVAL OF THE COLORADO
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.
(4) A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY THAT
DESIGNATES A ROADWAY AS A SCHOOL STREET MAY CLOSE THE SCHOOL
STREET TO VEHICLES.
(5) ALL VEHICLES TRAVELING ALONG A SCHOOL STREET SHALL YIELD
THE RIGHT-OF-WAY TO A PEDESTRIAN, BICYCLIST, OR MICROMOBILITY USER.
A BICYCLIST OR OPERATOR OF A MICROMOBILITY DEVICE SHALL YIELD THE
RIGHT-OF-WAY TO A PEDESTRIAN ON A SCHOOL STREET.
(6) A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAVING JURISDICTION OVER
THE PLACEMENT OF TRAFFIC SIGNS AND TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES ON A
SCHOOL STREET SHALL POST CONSPICUOUS TRAFFIC SIGNS INDICATING AN
AREA DESIGNATED AS A SCHOOL STREET AS A SCHOOL STREET.
(7) THE MAXIMUM SPEED LIMIT ON A SCHOOL STREET IS TEN MILES
PER HOUR. A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAVING JURISDICTION OVER
THE PLACEMENT OF TRAFFIC SIGNS SHALL POST SPEED LIMIT SIGNS ON A
SCHOOL STREET.
(8) SECTIONS 42-4-801, 42-4-803, AND 42-4-805 (1) AND ( 2) DO NOT
APPLY TO SCHOOL STREETS.
(9) A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY THAT
DESIGNATES A ROADWAY AS A SCHOOL STREET MAY SUSPEND ADDITIONAL
TRAFFIC PROVISIONS ON THE SCHOOL STREET THAT ENDANGER PEDESTRIANS,
BICYCLISTS, OR MICROMOBILITY USERS AND FRUSTRATE EASE OF
PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE MOVEMENT.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1318

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1318